Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-501
Saline lands; lease.

All the saline lands of which the title is vested in the state shall be leased by the Board of Educational Lands and Funds.

Laws 1889, c. 94, § 1, p. 580;

R.S.1913, § 5876;

C.S.1922, § 5238;

C.S.1929, § 72-501;

R.S.1943, § 72-501.